Massachusetts, session 194th, H1111.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 167B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is amended
by inserting after section 10 the following new section:-
Section 10A. If a financial institution fails to pay a preauthorized transfer authorized by a
consumer for any reason other than those stated in section 10, and as a result the consumer is
charged with a fine, penalty and/or late charge, by a third party then said financial institution
shall pay the third party or reimburse the consumer the fine, penalty and/or charge, and any
interest associated with the failure to pay within 5 days of discovering the error by the financial
institution or within 5 days of when the consumer reports the error to the financial consumer.
Should a financial institution who willfully and knowingly fails to comply with this section, then
of 2

a consumer shall be entitled to treble damages as determined under clause (1) of subsection (a) of
section 20 from said financial institution.
of 2